Utah statutes.
26A-1-118.   Treasurer of local department -- Bond.
(1)  In county health departments, the county treasurer shall serve as
treasurer of the local health department.
(2) Unless another county treasurer is designated pursuant to the interlocal
agreement creating the multicounty local health department, the county
treasurer of the county in which the headquarters of the local health
department is located shall serve as treasurer of the local health department.
(3)  The official bond of a county treasurer shall  cover the duties as
treasurer of a local health department.
